Vermont, session 2025-2026, H556.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
11 Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
12 § 383. DEFINITIONS
13 As used in this subchapter:
14 (1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.
15 (2) “Employee” means any individual employed or permitted to work
16 by an employer except:
17 * * *
18 (H) outside salespersons; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.556
2026 Page 2 of 2
1 (I) students working during all or any part of the school year or
2 regular vacation periods; and
3 (J) members of the legislative body of a municipality.
4 * * *
5 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
6 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 383 is amended to read:
§ 383. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.
(2) “Employee” means any individual employed or permitted to work by
an employer except:
* * *
(H) outside salespersons; and
(I) students working during all or any part of the school year or
regular vacation periods; and
(J) elected and appointed municipal officers.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.